Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 524 (3) 91 ss/ns/md H.F. 524 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 136D.5 Minorsâ use of tanning 1 devices ââ restrictions. 2 1. A tanning facility shall not allow a person under 3 eighteen years of age to use a tanning device unless the parent 4 or guardian of the person first provides written consent in 5 person to the tanning facility for the person to use a tanning 6 device, which must include the following statement: 7 UV tanning devices increase the risk of melanoma, a 8 particularly deadly type of skin cancer. UV radiation is most 9 dangerous when exposed at a young age. 10 2. A written consent provided pursuant to subsection 1 shall 11 remain valid for subsequent visits to the tanning facility. 12 However, the written consent may be revoked at any time by the 13 parent or guardian who provided it. 14 -1- HF 524 (3) 91 ss/ns/md 1/ 1